Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 16. University of Wyoming Reclamation and Restoration Center Challenge Account

Effective dates. —

Laws 2011, ch. 53, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2011.

§ 21-16-1601.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Challenge account” means the reclamation and restoration challenge account established under W.S.

21-16-1602

;

“Qualifying contribution” means a transfer of money or other property of a value of not less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) to the University of Wyoming foundation to be expended by the university exclusively for the Wyoming reclamation and restoration center. The commitment for a qualifying contribution or the contribution itself shall be made in the period beginning July 1, 2011 and ending June 30, 2018. The contribution shall be actually received by the University of Wyoming foundation on or before June 30, 2020.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 53, § 1; 2016 ch. 116, § 4, effective March 14, 2016.

The 2016 amendment,

substituted “2018” for “2016” and “2020” for “2018” in (a)(ii).

Laws 2016 ch. 116, § 9, makes the act effective upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 15, 2016.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 21-16-1602.
University reclamation and restoration challenge account.

The university reclamation and restoration challenge account is created.

All investment earnings from funds in the account shall be credited to the account. Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

, 9-2-1012(e) or

9-4-207

, funds within the account shall not lapse or revert until June 30, 2022. Until reverted, funds within the account are continuously appropriated and shall remain available for distribution as provided in this article.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 53, § 1; 2016 ch. 116, § 4, effective March 14, 2016.

The 2016 amendment,

substituted “2022” for “2020” in (b).

Laws 2016 ch. 116, § 9, makes the act effective upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 15, 2016.

§ 21-16-1603.
University reclamation and restoration challenge account matching program; matching payments; conditions; annual reports; reversion of appropriations.

The university shall administer the university reclamation and restoration challenge account established under this article. The following shall apply to the administration of the challenge account:

To the extent that funds are available in the challenge account, the university shall match each qualifying contribution actually received by the University of Wyoming foundation by authorizing expenditures from the challenge account in an amount equal to the amount of the qualifying contribution. Qualifying contributions made directly to the university shall be considered qualifying contributions to the foundation for purposes of this article. The university shall expend both the qualifying contributions and the matching funds solely for the Wyoming reclamation and restoration center. Any investment earnings credited to the account shall be separately accounted for and may be expended by the university to support the center without a qualifying contribution. To the greatest extent practicable, expenditures for the center shall be made for energy related reclamation projects so that qualifying contributions and matching funds support the work of the center through June 30, 2019. All grants shall be subject to the approval and oversight of an ad hoc committee of industry company representatives appointed by the dean of agriculture;

If a qualifying contribution is made through a series of payments or transfers, no matching funds shall be authorized for expenditure from the challenge account until the total value of all payments or transfers actually received toward the contribution totals at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00). Thereafter, matching funds shall be authorized for expenditure as payments or transfers toward that qualifying contribution are received by the foundation;

The university shall authorize matching funds for expenditure, or encumber funds for future authorization in the case of a written commitment, to match a qualifying contribution based on the order in which each qualifying contribution is actually received or in which a written commitment to make a qualifying contribution is received by the foundation. Matching funds shall not be authorized for expenditure or encumbered in excess of the amount within the challenge account. The university shall rescind an encumbrance if a donor who made a commitment will not make a qualifying contribution that is eligible for matching funds under this section;

For the purpose of calculating the matching amount only, the university shall use the value of a qualifying contribution based on its fair market value at the time the contribution is received by the university foundation;

The university shall on or before October 1 of each calendar year submit a report to the governor, joint appropriations interim committee and the joint education interim committee from the university foundation regarding the matching program established under this section for the preceding fiscal year. The report shall include a financial summary and a review of the accomplishments resulting from expenditures.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.